Illinois, session 104th, HB1118.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 521B-45 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/21B-45)7    Sec. 21B-45. Professional Educator License renewal. 8    (a) Individuals holding a Professional Educator License 9are required to complete the licensure renewal requirements as 10specified in this Section, unless otherwise provided in this 11Code.12    Individuals holding a Professional Educator License shall 13meet the renewal requirements set forth in this Section, 14unless otherwise provided in this Code. If an individual holds 15a license endorsed in more than one area that has different 16renewal requirements, that individual shall follow the renewal 17requirements for the position for which he or she spends the 18majority of his or her time working.19    (b) All Professional Educator Licenses not renewed as 20provided in this Section shall lapse on September 1 of that 21year. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Section, if 22a license holder's electronic mail address is available, the 23State Board of Education shall send him or her notification   HB1118- 2 -LRB104 04491 LNS 14518 b1electronically that his or her license will lapse if not 2renewed, to be sent no more than 6 months prior to the license 3lapsing. Lapsed licenses may be immediately reinstated upon 4(i) payment to the State Board of Education by the applicant of 5the lesser of a $50 penalty or a $10 penalty for each year the 6license has lapsed or (ii) the demonstration of proficiency by 7completing 9 semester hours of coursework from a regionally 8accredited institution of higher education in the content area 9that most aligns with one or more of the educator's 10endorsement areas. Any and all back fees, including without 11limitation registration fees owed from the time of expiration 12of the license until the date of reinstatement, shall be paid 13and kept in accordance with the provisions in Article 3 of this 14Code concerning an institute fund and the provisions in 15Article 21B of this Code concerning fees and requirements for 16registration. Licenses not registered in accordance with 17Section 21B-40 of this Code shall lapse after a period of 6 18months from the expiration of the last year of registration or 19on January 1 of the fiscal year following initial issuance of 20the license. An unregistered license is invalid after 21September 1 for employment and performance of services in an 22Illinois public or State-operated school or cooperative and in 23a charter school. Any license or endorsement may be 24voluntarily surrendered by the license holder. A voluntarily 25surrendered license shall be treated as a revoked license. An 26Educator License with Stipulations with only a   HB1118- 3 -LRB104 04491 LNS 14518 b1paraprofessional endorsement does not lapse. 2    (c) From July 1, 2013 through June 30, 2014, in order to 3satisfy the requirements for licensure renewal provided for in 4this Section, each professional educator licensee with an 5administrative endorsement who is working in a position 6requiring such endorsement shall complete one Illinois 7Administrators' Academy course, as described in Article 2 of 8this Code, per fiscal year.9    (c-5) All licenses issued by the State Board of Education 10under this Article that expire on June 30, 2020 and have not 11been renewed by the end of the 2020 renewal period shall be 12extended for one year and shall expire on June 30, 2021. 13    (d) Beginning July 1, 2014, in order to satisfy the 14requirements for licensure renewal provided for in this 15Section, each professional educator licensee may create a 16professional development plan each year. The plan shall 17address one or more of the endorsements that are required of 18his or her educator position if the licensee is employed and 19performing services in an Illinois public or State-operated 20school or cooperative. If the licensee is employed in a 21charter school, the plan shall address that endorsement or 22those endorsements most closely related to his or her educator 23position. Licensees employed and performing services in any 24other Illinois schools may participate in the renewal 25requirements by adhering to the same process.26    Except as otherwise provided in this Section, the   HB1118- 4 -LRB104 04491 LNS 14518 b1licensee's professional development activities shall align 2with one or more of the following criteria:3        (1) activities are of a type that engages participants 4    over a sustained period of time allowing for analysis, 5    discovery, and application as they relate to student 6    learning, social or emotional achievement, or well-being;7        (2) professional development aligns to the licensee's 8    performance;9        (3) outcomes for the activities must relate to student 10    growth or district improvement;11        (4) activities align to State-approved standards; and12        (5) higher education coursework.13    (e) For each renewal cycle, each professional educator 14licensee shall engage in professional development activities. 15Prior to renewal, the licensee shall enter electronically into 16the Educator Licensure Information System (ELIS) the name, 17date, and location of the activity, the number of professional 18development hours, and the provider's name. The following 19provisions shall apply concerning professional development 20activities:21        (1) Each licensee shall complete a total of 120 hours 22    of professional development per 5-year renewal cycle in 23    order to renew the license, except as otherwise provided 24    in this Section.25        (2) Beginning with his or her first full 5-year cycle, 26    any licensee with an administrative endorsement who is not   HB1118- 5 -LRB104 04491 LNS 14518 b1    working in a position requiring such endorsement is not 2    required to complete Illinois Administrators' Academy 3    courses, as described in Article 2 of this Code. Such 4    licensees must complete one Illinois Administrators' 5    Academy course within one year after returning to a 6    position that requires the administrative endorsement. 7        (3) Any licensee with an administrative endorsement 8    who is working in a position requiring such endorsement or 9    an individual with a Teacher Leader endorsement serving in 10    an administrative capacity at least 50% of the day shall 11    complete one Illinois Administrators' Academy course, as 12    described in Article 2 of this Code, each fiscal year in 13    addition to 100 hours of professional development per 14    5-year renewal cycle in accordance with this Code. 15    However, for the 2021-2022 school year only, a licensee 16    under this paragraph (3) is not required to complete an 17    Illinois Administrators' Academy course.18        (4) Any licensee holding a current National Board for 19    Professional Teaching Standards (NBPTS) master teacher 20    designation shall complete a total of 60 hours of 21    professional development per 5-year renewal cycle in order 22    to renew the license.23        (5) Licensees working in a position that does not 24    require educator licensure or working in a position for 25    less than 50% for any particular year are considered to be 26    exempt and shall be required to pay only the registration   HB1118- 6 -LRB104 04491 LNS 14518 b1    fee in order to renew and maintain the validity of the 2    license.3        (6) Licensees who are retired and qualify for benefits 4    from a State of Illinois retirement system shall be listed 5    as retired, and the license shall be maintained in retired 6    status. For any renewal cycle in which a licensee retires 7    during the renewal cycle, the licensee must complete 8    professional development activities on a prorated basis 9    depending on the number of years during the renewal cycle 10    the educator held an active license. If a licensee retires 11    during a renewal cycle, the license status must be updated 12    using ELIS indicating that the licensee wishes to maintain 13    the license in retired status and the licensee must show 14    proof of completion of professional development activities 15    on a prorated basis for all years of that renewal cycle for 16    which the license was active. An individual with a license 17    in retired status shall not be required to complete 18    professional development activities until returning to a 19    position that requires educator licensure. Upon returning 20    to work in a position that requires the Professional 21    Educator License, the license status shall immediately be 22    updated using ELIS and the licensee shall complete renewal 23    requirements for that year. A retired teacher, even if 24    returning to a position that requires educator licensure, 25    shall not be required to pay registration fees. A license 26    in retired status cannot lapse. Beginning on January 6,   HB1118- 7 -LRB104 04491 LNS 14518 b1    2017 (the effective date of Public Act 99-920) through 2    December 31, 2017, any licensee who has retired and whose 3    license has lapsed for failure to renew as provided in 4    this Section may reinstate that license and maintain it in 5    retired status upon providing proof to the State Board of 6    Education using ELIS that the licensee is retired and is 7    not working in a position that requires a Professional 8    Educator License.9        (7) For any renewal cycle in which professional 10    development hours were required, but not fulfilled, the 11    licensee shall complete any missed hours to total the 12    minimum professional development hours required in this 13    Section prior to September 1 of that year. Professional 14    development hours used to fulfill the minimum required 15    hours for a renewal cycle may be used for only one renewal 16    cycle. For any fiscal year or renewal cycle in which an 17    Illinois Administrators' Academy course was required but 18    not completed, the licensee shall complete any missed 19    Illinois Administrators' Academy courses prior to 20    September 1 of that year. The licensee may complete all 21    deficient hours and Illinois Administrators' Academy 22    courses while continuing to work in a position that 23    requires that license until September 1 of that year.24        (8) Any licensee who has not fulfilled the 25    professional development renewal requirements set forth in 26    this Section at the end of any 5-year renewal cycle is   HB1118- 8 -LRB104 04491 LNS 14518 b1    ineligible to register his or her license and may submit 2    an appeal to the State Superintendent of Education for 3    reinstatement of the license. 4        (9) If professional development opportunities were 5    unavailable to a licensee, proof that opportunities were 6    unavailable and request for an extension of time beyond 7    August 31 to complete the renewal requirements may be 8    submitted from April 1 through June 30 of that year to the 9    State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board. If an 10    extension is approved, the license shall remain valid 11    during the extension period. 12        (10) Individuals who hold exempt licenses prior to 13    December 27, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 14    98-610) shall commence the annual renewal process with the 15    first scheduled registration due after December 27, 2013 16    (the effective date of Public Act 98-610). 17        (11) Notwithstanding any other provision of this 18    subsection (e), if a licensee earns more than the required 19    number of professional development hours during a renewal 20    cycle, then the licensee may carry over any hours earned 21    from April 1 through June 30 of the last year of the 22    renewal cycle. Any hours carried over in this manner must 23    be applied to the next renewal cycle. Illinois 24    Administrators' Academy courses or hours earned in those 25    courses may not be carried over. 26    (e-5) The number of professional development hours   HB1118- 9 -LRB104 04491 LNS 14518 b1required under subsection (e) is reduced by 20% for any 2renewal cycle that includes the 2021-2022 school year. 3    (f) At the time of renewal, each licensee shall respond to 4the required questions under penalty of perjury.5    (f-5) The State Board of Education shall conduct random 6audits of licensees to verify a licensee's fulfillment of the 7professional development hours required under this Section. 8Upon completion of a random audit, if it is determined by the 9State Board of Education that the licensee did not complete 10the required number of professional development hours or did 11not provide sufficient proof of completion, the licensee shall 12be notified that his or her license has lapsed. A license that 13has lapsed under this subsection may be reinstated as provided 14in subsection (b). 15    (g) The following entities shall be designated as approved 16to provide professional development activities for the renewal 17of Professional Educator Licenses:18        (1) The State Board of Education.19        (2) Regional offices of education and intermediate 20    service centers.21        (3) Illinois professional associations representing 22    the following groups that are approved by the State 23    Superintendent of Education:24            (A) school administrators;25            (B) principals;26            (C) school business officials;  HB1118- 10 -LRB104 04491 LNS 14518 b1            (D) teachers, including special education 2        teachers;3            (E) school boards;4            (F) school districts;5            (G) parents; and 6            (H) school service personnel. 7        (4) Regionally accredited institutions of higher 8    education that offer Illinois-approved educator 9    preparation programs and public community colleges subject 10    to the Public Community College Act.11        (5) Illinois public school districts, charter schools 12    authorized under Article 27A of this Code, and joint 13    educational programs authorized under Article 10 of this 14    Code for the purposes of providing career and technical 15    education or special education services.16        (6) A not-for-profit organization that, as of December 17    31, 2014 (the effective date of Public Act 98-1147), has 18    had or has a grant from or a contract with the State Board 19    of Education to provide professional development services 20    in the area of English Learning to Illinois school 21    districts, teachers, or administrators. 22        (7) State agencies, State boards, and State 23    commissions. 24        (8) Museums as defined in Section 10 of the Museum 25    Disposition of Property Act. 26    (h) Approved providers under subsection (g) of this   HB1118- 11 -LRB104 04491 LNS 14518 b1Section shall make available professional development 2opportunities that satisfy at least one of the following: 3        (1) increase the knowledge and skills of school and 4    district leaders who guide continuous professional 5    development;6        (2) improve the learning of students;7        (3) organize adults into learning communities whose 8    goals are aligned with those of the school and district;9        (4) deepen educator's content knowledge;10        (5) provide educators with research-based 11    instructional strategies to assist students in meeting 12    rigorous academic standards;13        (6) prepare educators to appropriately use various 14    types of classroom assessments;15        (7) use learning strategies appropriate to the 16    intended goals;17        (8) provide educators with the knowledge and skills to 18    collaborate;19        (9) prepare educators to apply research to decision 20    making;21        (10) provide educators with training on inclusive 22    practices in the classroom that examines instructional and 23    behavioral strategies that improve academic and 24    social-emotional outcomes for all students, with or 25    without disabilities, in a general education setting; or26        (11) beginning on July 1, 2022, provide educators with   HB1118- 12 -LRB104 04491 LNS 14518 b1    training on the physical and mental health needs of 2    students, student safety, educator ethics, professional 3    conduct, and other topics that address the well-being of 4    students and improve the academic and social-emotional 5    outcomes of students.6    (i) Approved providers under subsection (g) of this 7Section shall do the following:8        (1) align professional development activities to the 9    State-approved national standards for professional 10    learning;11        (2) meet the professional development criteria for 12    Illinois licensure renewal;13        (3) produce a rationale for the activity that explains 14    how it aligns to State standards and identify the 15    assessment for determining the expected impact on student 16    learning or school improvement;17        (4) maintain original documentation for completion of 18    activities;19        (5) provide license holders with evidence of 20    completion of activities;21        (6) request an Illinois Educator Identification Number 22    (IEIN) for each educator during each professional 23    development activity; and 24        (7) beginning on July 1, 2019, register annually with 25    the State Board of Education prior to offering any 26    professional development opportunities in the current   HB1118- 13 -LRB104 04491 LNS 14518 b1    fiscal year. 2    (j) The State Board of Education shall conduct annual 3audits of a subset of approved providers, except for school 4districts, which shall be audited by regional offices of 5education and intermediate service centers. The State Board of 6Education shall ensure that each approved provider, except for 7a school district, is audited at least once every 5 years. The 8State Board of Education may conduct more frequent audits of 9providers if evidence suggests the requirements of this 10Section or administrative rules are not being met.11        (1) (Blank).12        (2) Approved providers shall comply with the 13    requirements in subsections (h) and (i) of this Section by 14    annually submitting data to the State Board of Education 15    demonstrating how the professional development activities 16    impacted one or more of the following:17            (A) educator and student growth in regards to 18        content knowledge or skills, or both;19            (B) educator and student social and emotional 20        growth; or21            (C) alignment to district or school improvement 22        plans.23        (3) The State Superintendent of Education shall review 24    the data collected by the State Board of Education, 25    regional offices of education, and intermediate service 26    centers in audits conducted under this subsection (j) to   HB1118- 14 -LRB104 04491 LNS 14518 b1    determine if the approved provider has met the criteria 2    and should continue to be an approved provider or if 3    further action should be taken as provided in rules.4    (k) Registration fees shall be paid for the next renewal 5cycle between April 1 and June 30 in the last year of each 65-year renewal cycle using ELIS. If all required professional 7development hours for the renewal cycle have been completed 8and entered by the licensee, the licensee shall pay the 9registration fees for the next cycle using a form of credit or 10debit card. 11    (l) Any professional educator licensee endorsed for school 12support personnel who is employed and performing services in 13Illinois public schools and who holds an active and current 14professional license issued by the Department of Financial and 15Professional Regulation or a national certification board, as 16approved by the State Board of Education, related to the 17endorsement areas on the Professional Educator License shall 18be deemed to have satisfied the continuing professional 19development requirements provided for in this Section. Such 20individuals shall be required to pay only registration fees to 21renew the Professional Educator License. An individual who 22does not hold a license issued by the Department of Financial 23and Professional Regulation shall complete professional 24development requirements for the renewal of a Professional 25Educator License provided for in this Section.26    (m) Appeals to the State Educator Preparation and   HB1118- 15 -LRB104 04491 LNS 14518 b1Licensure Board must be made within 30 days after receipt of 2notice from the State Superintendent of Education that a 3license will not be renewed based upon failure to complete the 4requirements of this Section. A licensee may appeal that 5decision to the State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board 6in a manner prescribed by rule.7        (1) Each appeal shall state the reasons why the State 8    Superintendent's decision should be reversed and shall be 9    sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the 10    State Board of Education.11        (2) The State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board 12    shall review each appeal regarding renewal of a license 13    within 90 days after receiving the appeal in order to 14    determine whether the licensee has met the requirements of 15    this Section. The State Educator Preparation and Licensure 16    Board may hold an appeal hearing or may make its 17    determination based upon the record of review, which shall 18    consist of the following:19            (A) the regional superintendent of education's 20        rationale for recommending nonrenewal of the license, 21        if applicable;22            (B) any evidence submitted to the State 23        Superintendent along with the individual's electronic 24        statement of assurance for renewal; and25            (C) the State Superintendent's rationale for 26        nonrenewal of the license.  HB1118- 16 -LRB104 04491 LNS 14518 b1        (3) The State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board 2    shall notify the licensee of its decision regarding 3    license renewal by certified mail, return receipt 4    requested, no later than 30 days after reaching a 5    decision. Upon receipt of notification of renewal, the 6    licensee, using ELIS, shall pay the applicable 7    registration fee for the next cycle using a form of credit 8    or debit card.9    (n) The State Board of Education may adopt rules as may be 10necessary to implement this Section.11(Source: P.A. 102-676, eff. 12-3-21; 102-710, eff. 4-27-22; 12102-730, eff. 5-6-22; 102-852, eff. 5-13-22; 103-154, eff. 136-30-23; 103-780, eff. 8-2-24.) 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.